Washington statutes.
RCW 37.08.260

Auburn general depot.

Concurrent jurisdiction shall be, and the same is hereby ceded to the United States over and within all the land comprising the Auburn General Depot area, being 570.08 acres, more or less, situate in King county, state of Washington; saving, however, to the state the right to serve civil and criminal process within the limits of the aforesaid area in suits or prosecutions for or on account of rights acquired, obligations incurred or crimes committed in said state, but outside of said area. The metes and bounds description of the land over which jurisdiction is ceded hereby is as follows:

A parcel of land in sections 24 and 25, Township 21 North, Range 4 East, Willamette Meridian, King County, as follows: Beginning at a point on the west line of the Northern Pacific Railway right-of-way which point is S 89˚16'55" W, 423.65 feet and N 2˚12'33" W, 20 feet from the southeast corner of section 25, thence S 89˚16'55" W, 1548.93 feet along the north right-of-way line of Ellingson Road to a point, thence N 0˚10'45" E, 1298.11 feet to a point, thence S 89˚31'28" W, 638.25 feet to the east right-of-way line of Greenhalgh Road, thence N 0˚08'47" E, 1351.31 feet along said east right-of-way line to its intersection with the north right-of-way line of Algona Road, thence S 89˚46'07" W, 1724.35 feet along said north right-of-way line to a point on the easterly right-of-way line of the Chicago, Milwaukee, St. Paul and Pacific Railroad, thence N 0˚04'38" W, 1223.74 feet along said right-of-way to a point of spiral curve, thence along a spiral curve whose central angle is 1˚36'14" and whose long chord bears N 0˚27'20" E, 158.51 feet, thence along a circular curve to the right, whose radius bears S 88˚28'24" E, 2822.01 feet, through a central angle of 21˚16'24" for a distance of 1047.78 feet to a point of spiral, thence along a spiral curve whose central angle is 1˚36'14", and whose long chord bears N 23˚51'42" E, 158.51 feet, thence N 24˚24'15" E, 3088.12 feet to a point of spiral curve, thence along a spiral whose central angle is 1˚35'51", and whose long chord bears N 23˚51'55" E, 161.51 feet to point of circular curve, thence along a circular curve, to the left, whose radius bears N 67˚11'36" W, 2908.01 feet, through a central angle of 20˚58'46" for a distance of 1064.80 feet, thence along a spiral curve to the left, whose central angle is 1˚35'51", and whose long chord bears N 0˚45'10" E, 161.51 feet, thence N 0˚13'47" E, 1148.81 feet to the centerline of the Chicago, Milwaukee, St. Paul and Pacific Railroad and Northern Pacific crossover track being a point in a curve, thence along centerline of said crossover track on a curve to the left in a southeasterly direction, from a radius which bears N 63˚36'26" E, 351.28 feet, through a central angle of 26˚50'13" for a distance of 164.54 feet, thence S 53˚13'47" E, 1840.78 feet along said centerline, thence along a curve to the right in a southeasterly direction, from a radius which bears S 36˚46'13" W, 386.60 feet, through a central angle of 10˚26'06" for a distance of 70.41 feet to the intersection of the westerly right-of-way line of county road No. 76, thence *S 2˚12'33" E, 6596.21 feet along the westerly right-of-way line of county road No. 76 to the East-West centerline of said section 25, thence N 89˚46'02" E, 60.04 feet to the westerly right-of-way line of the Northern Pacific Railway Company, thence S 2˚12'33" E, 2605.01 feet to point of beginning. The jurisdiction ceded hereby does not extend to any existing perimeter railroad or county road right-of-way.

[ 1951 c 40 s 1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: In the third from the last course, the "2" in the description "S 2˚12'33" E" was by typographical error omitted from the session laws. The digit is inserted by the reviser after verification from original sources.